Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201286-904
Sellers; remittance; deduction authorized;
audit and appeal provisions applicable; Department of Revenue; duties; deduction.

(1) Sellers shall remit
collected prepaid wireless surcharges to the Department of Revenue at the
times and in the manner provided in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 with
respect to sales tax. The department shall establish registration and payment
procedures that substantially coincide with the registration and payment procedures
that apply to sales tax.

(2) A seller shall be
permitted to deduct and retain three percent of prepaid wireless surcharges
that are collected by the seller from consumers.

(3) The audit and appeal procedures
applicable to sales tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall apply
to prepaid wireless surcharges.

(4) The Department of Revenue shall establish procedures
by which a seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service may document
that a sale is not a retail transaction, which procedures shall substantially
coincide with the procedures for documenting sale for resale transactions
for sales tax purposes.

(5)
After deducting an amount, not to exceed two percent of charges, to be retained
by the department to reimburse its direct costs of administering the collection
and remittance of prepaid wireless surcharges, the department shall remit
all collected prepaid wireless surcharges to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Enhanced Wireless 911 Fund and the Nebraska Telecommunications Relay
System Fund in the proportions that the respective corresponding components
of the prepaid wireless surcharge under subsection (2) of section 86-903 bear
to the total prepaid wireless surcharge.

Laws 2012, LB1091, § 4.
July 19, 2012
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.